Nebraska, session 109, LB1143.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1143 LB1143
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-949, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-949 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department
implement reforms to the medical assistance program such as those
contained in the Medicaid Reform Plan, including (a) an incremental
expansion of home and community-based services for aged persons and
persons with disabilities consistent with such plan, (b) an increase in
care coordination or disease management initiatives to better manage
medical assistance expenditures on behalf of high-cost recipients with
multiple or chronic medical conditions, and (c) other reforms as deemed
necessary and appropriate by the department, in consultation with the
committee.
(2) The department shall develop recommendations based on a
comprehensive analysis of various options available to the state under
applicable federal law for the provision of medical assistance to persons
with disabilities who are employed, including persons with a medically
improved disability, to enhance and replace current eligibility
provisions contained in subdivision (8) of section 68-915.
(3) The department shall develop recommendations for further
modification or replacement of the defined benefit structure of the
medical assistance program. Such recommendations shall be consistent with
the public policy in section 68-905 and shall consider the needs and
resources of low-income Nebraska residents who are eligible or may become
eligible for medical assistance, the experience and outcomes of other
states that have developed and implemented such changes, and other
relevant factors as determined by the department.
(4)(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the total amount
appropriated to the department for medicaid nursing facility rates be
identified as a dollar amount in the state budget and be used in the
medicaid nursing facility rate calculation, including the calculation of
the annual inflation factor. The total amount appropriated for medicaid
-2-

LB1143 LB1143
2026 2026
nursing facility rates shall include amounts for rate enhancement and any
other purpose related to medicaid nursing facility services and shall be
used as the base for funding for the following fiscal year. The
department may take into consideration utilization relating to client
needs and preferred setting when establishing nursing facility rates for
prospective rating periods. If the department uses an amount that differs
from the identified appropriation in the calculation of nursing facility
rates for the prospective rate period, such dollar amount and the number
of projected nursing facility resident days used in the calculation shall
be identified to the Legislature in the report required under subdivision
(4)(b) of this section.
(b) The department shall file a report electronically with the
Legislative Fiscal Analyst and the Clerk of the Legislature no later than
August 1 of each year identifying how the inflation factor was calculated
for that year's medicaid nursing facility rates and including the
information described in subdivision (4)(a) of this section.
(c) The department shall file a report electronically with the
Legislative Fiscal Analyst and the Clerk of the Legislature between
December 15 and December 31 of each year identifying the amount of any
remaining unobligated appropriation from the prior appropriations
earmarked for medicaid nursing facility payments. The report shall
include an identification of encumbrances and retroactive payments.
(5) No later than December 31, 2026, the department shall submit an
application to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to
establish a money follows the person program to assist qualified
individuals to transition from an institutional setting to a community
setting while continuing to receive long-term care.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-949, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-